Missouri, session 2026, HB1924.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 461, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 461.900, to read as follows:
461.900. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Charitable
Organizations Privacy Protection Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Beneficiary designation", a provision in an instrument designating a
beneficiary, other than in a will or an instrument creating a trust, and may also mean
the instrument itself including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) An annuity or insurance policy;
(b) An account with a designation for payment on death;
(c) A security registered in beneficiary form;
(d) A pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or other employment-related benefit
plan; and
(e) Any other nonprobate transfer at death;
(2) "Charitable organization", an organization with a charitable purpose that
does business in this state or holds property in this state and is described in section 501
(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as being exempt from taxation under section 501(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1924 2
(3) "Charitable purpose", a purpose described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, scientific,
patriotic, social welfare or advocacy, public health, environmental conservation, civic,
or other eleemosynary objective.
3. If a charitable organization is a beneficiary of an interest in property created
by beneficiary designation, the charitable organization may present an affidavit to the
holder of the property or to any person with information about the property for the
purpose of obtaining the property or information regarding the property. The affidavit
shall state the following:
(1) The decedent's name and last known address;
(2) A general description of the property to the extent known;
(3) The charitable organization's name, address, and primary contact
information;
(4) That the charitable organization is a charitable organization as defined in
this section;
(5) A request that the property be paid or transferred to the charitable
organization or that information about the property be given to the charitable
organization;
(6) That no one other than the charitable organization has a right to the interest
in the property listed in the affidavit;
(7) That the affidavit has been signed by a duly authorized representative of the
charitable organization under penalty of perjury before a notary public as provided in
chapter 486; and
(8) That the information in the affidavit is true and correct.
4. The affidavit shall be accompanied by the following:
(1) A copy of the charitable organization's determination letter from the
Internal Revenue Service recognizing its tax-exempt status;
(2) A copy of the charitable organization's certificate of good standing issued by
the secretary of state as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is
in good standing;
(3) A statement that on information or belief of the affiant, the property owner is
deceased supported by a death certificate of the decedent, or probate notice published
by the personal representative of the decedent's estate, or proof of payment of the
decedent's funeral expenses, or the decedent's obituary as verification of the decedent's
death;
(4) A corporate resolution or similar statement of authority of the affiant to act
on behalf of the charitable organization; and

HB 1924 3
(5) Federal Internal Revenue Service form W-9 completed by an authorized
representative of the charitable organization.
5. The holder of the property shall not request any additional personal
information from any individual employed by or serving on the board of the charitable
organization including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Social security number or driver's license number;
(2) Contact information; or
(3) Personal financial information.
6. If the requirements of subsections 3 and 4 of this section are satisfied, the
following apply:
(1) The decedent's property shall be paid, delivered, or transferred to or for the
benefit of the charitable organization if the affidavit has requested the transfer of
ownership of the property to the charitable organization;
(2) A transfer agent of a security described in the affidavit shall change
reqistered ownership on the books of the corporation from the decedent to or for the
benefit of the charitable organization if the affidavit has requested the transfer of
ownership of the property to the charitable organization; and
(3) The information requested in the affidavit shall be delivered to the
organization.
7. The holder of the property and any person who in good faith delivers the
property or information requested in reliance on information a charitable organization
provides under this section, who has no knowledge that representations contained in the
affidavit are incorrect, shall not be liable to any person for so acting and may assume
without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the affidavit. The time to verify a
charitable organization's authority shall not exceed thirty days from the date of delivery
of the affidavit. Any right or title acquired from the charitable organization in
consideration of the provision of property or information under this section is not
invalid in consequence of misapplication by the charitable organization. A transaction
and a lien created by a transaction entered into by the charitable organization and
anyone acting in reliance on the affidavit under this section is enforceable against the
property the charitable organization has requested.
8. If the holder of the property refuses to provide the requested property or
information within thirty days after receiving the affidavit, the charitable organization
may bring an action against the holder of the property to recover the property or receive
the information or to compel the delivery of the property. An action brought under this
section shall be brought within one year after the date of the act or failure to act. If the
court finds that the holder of the property acted unreasonably in failing to deliver the

HB 1924 4
property or information as requested in the affidavit, the court may award to the
charitable organization any or all of the following:
(1) Damages sustained by the charitable organization;
(2) Costs of the action;
(3) A penalty in an amount determined by the court between five hundred
dollars and ten thousand dollars; and
(4) Reasonable attorney's fees based on the value of the time reasonably
expended by the charitable organization's attorney.
✔